West Virginia, session 2026, SB41.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 36. standardized testing choice act. §18-36-1. Definitions. "CLT" means the Classic Learning Test administered by Classic Learning Initiatives. §18-36-2. Post-Secondary and Higher Education Admissions and Financial Aid. (a) Public institutions of higher education shall accept a student's score on the ACT, CLT, or SAT, as those terms are otherwise defined in this code, for purposes of admission.(b) A student is eligible for college financial aid if, in addition to the requirements in this code, the student attains a composite ACT score of at least 19 or a concordant equivalent score on the SAT on any single SAT test or on the CLT on any single CLT test date. §18-36-3. College Preparation Assessments. (a) Public school districts shall provide each student in grades 11 and 12 with the opportunity to take the ACT, CLT, or SAT.(b) Public school districts shall provide each student in grades 9 and 10 with the opportunity to take the Pre-ACT, CLTlO, or PSAT.(c) Public school districts may apply for reimbursement for fees paid in relation to the administration of a college preparation assessment or practice assessment required by this section.